Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 2

Building Authority Division Act

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2003, No. 250, §§ 1-8, provided:

“SECTION 1.

Legislative intent and purpose.

“(a)

The General Assembly recognizes that confusion exists in the public's perception regarding the purpose of the Arkansas State Building Services due to the inconsistency between the name of the agency and its established purposes.

“(b)

The purpose of this act is to:

“(1)

Provide the agency with a name that more accurately describes its role as an agency, that is intended to fulfill the legislatively established purposes of leasing, property management, design review, and contract oversight of capital improvements; and

“(2)

Provide its supervisory board with a name consistent with the agency's name change.

“SECTION 2.

The Arkansas State Building Services, as established in Arkansas Code §22-2-101, shall be known as the Arkansas Building Authority.

“SECTION 3.

The State Building Services Council, as established in Arkansas Code §22-2-106, shall be known as the Arkansas Building Authority Council.

“SECTION 4.

The Arkansas State Building Services Maintenance Fund, as established in Arkansas Code §19-5-1406, shall be known as the Arkansas Building Authority Maintenance Fund.

“SECTION 5.

The State Building Services Fund, as established in Arkansas Code §22-2-119, shall be known as the Arkansas Building Authority Fund.

“SECTION 6.

The State Building Services Account of the General Improvement Fund Account, as established in Arkansas Code §19-5-308, shall be known as the Arkansas Building Authority Account of the General Improvement Fund Account.

“SECTION 7.

The State Building Services Real Estate Fund, as established in Arkansas Code §19-5-1206, shall be known as the Arkansas Building Authority Real Estate Fund.

“SECTION 8.

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make all appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Cross References.

Exemption of realty owned by state from adverse possession, §22-1-204.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1977, No. 820, § 15, provided in part that to the extent that there is a conflict between the provisions of that act and this chapter the provisions of that act shall govern.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 17: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an urgent need for a State Building Services so as to coordinate the orderly physical development and operation of capital improvements of state agencies; that there is a pressing necessity of establishing minimum design, construction, maintenance, and leasing standards and criteria; and that there is a great need for the State of Arkansas to insure that moneys expended for capital improvement, leasing of space, and operation of state buildings are most efficiently, effectively and prudently utilized. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, welfare and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1983, No. 734, § 3: Mar. 23, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present laws relating to the authority and responsibility of the State Building Services and the State Building Services Council are not clear in certain areas, that this act is designed to clarify such authority and responsibility, and to invest the State Building Services and the State Building Services Council with broad authority concerning the alterations and repairs of existing public buildings, and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 12, § 6: Feb. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that one or more Arkansas State Retirement Systems own lands, buildings and facilities as a result of investment of assets of the systems; that to protect the interests of the systems, it is essential that they be permitted to operate and maintain such properties and that this act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 555, § 17: Mar. 12, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the state needs to assure that the system is able to provide the best possible benefits, including safe, adequate, and affordable facilities, for the system's members and that several changes in, and clarification of, existing laws are immediately necessary in order for the system to continue to efficiently, effectively and timely administer the member's retirement benefits. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 129: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the membership and duties of certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commissions and repeals other governmental entities; that these revisions and repeals of governmental entities impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the provisions of this act should become effective as soon as possible to allow for implementation of the new provisions in advance of the upcoming fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 5 and 12, § 5: Mar. 19, 2018. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the efficient design and construction of unpaved trail projects on property of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission will increase economic development in the state; that certain regulatory requirements have delayed unpaved trail projects in the state; that it is in the best interest of the state to remove certain regulatory burdens on these unpaved trail projects; and that the immediate implementation of this act will allow for the expedited design and construction of these unpaved trail projects and improve economic development across the state through the ability to immediately improve Arkansas's state parks and increase tourism. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-2-101. Title.

This chapter may be referred to and cited as the “Building Authority Division Act”.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1018.

22-2-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)(A)

“Capital improvement” means all lands, buildings, structures, utilities, on-site and off-site improvements, other appertaining improvements, existing or future, and all construction, repairs, alterations, demolitions, and renovations thereof which are undertaken, owned, operated, or otherwise managed by a state agency.

(B)

Except that “capital improvement” shall not include construction and reconstruction of roads and bridges in the state highway system by the State Highway Commission, nor shall the term “capital improvement” include any building, facility, plant, structure, or other improvement constructed by or on behalf of the Arkansas Department of Transportation or the State Highway Commission, nor shall the term “capital improvement” include any lands, buildings, or other structures or facilities now owned or hereafter acquired by an Arkansas state retirement system as an investment or as a result of the investment of assets of the system;

(2)

“Minimum standards and criteria” and other like phrases mean those standards and criteria relating to construction, design, maintenance, and leasing of state agencies' capital improvements as adopted by the Building Authority Division after appropriate public hearings and notice to the public and interested persons and organizations;

(3)

“State agency” means any board or commission, agency, department, institution of higher education, including colleges, universities, and vocational-technical schools, or other state institutions. However, “state agency” shall not include any county, municipality, school district, subdivision, or unit thereof of the State of Arkansas, nor shall the term “state agency” mean or include the Arkansas Department of Transportation or the State Highway Commission; and

(4)

“Unpaved trail project” means a project to create a trail:

(A)

That is on property under the immediate control and management of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission;

(B)

That is either:

(1)

To be used solely for recreational purposes; or

(2)

Otherwise necessary to carry out the mission of the State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission; and

(C)

For which the labor, services, and commodities are donated.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1019; Acts 1991, No. 12, § 1; 2003, No. 364, § 8; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 21; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 21; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 51; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 51; 2017, No. 707, §§
76, 77; 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 1; 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 12, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6154.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment redesignated former (1) as present (1)(A) and (1)(B) and made minor stylistic changes; and inserted “demolitions” in (1)(A).

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 deleted former (2) and (3) and renumbered the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Building Authority Council” in (2).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (1)(B) and (3).

The 2018 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 5 and 12 added (4).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (2).

22-2-103. Applicability — Construction with other laws.

(a)

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the construction and reconstruction of roads and bridges in the state highway system by the State Highway Commission. Except as specifically provided in Title 24, neither the provisions of this chapter nor the provisions of any other chapter of the Code shall apply to any lands, buildings, or other structures or facilities now owned or hereafter acquired by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, as defined in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Affordable Housing Investment Act, §24-7-1401 et seq., as an investment or as a result of the investment of assets of the system or pursuant to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Affordable Housing Investment Act, §24-7-1401 et seq. [repealed].

(b)

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to affect any bonds issued by state agencies or any covenants or obligations entered into in connection with such bonds or any revenues pledged or used in the security or payment of such bonds, or the production, handling, deposit, or application of such revenues, including bonds issued by the Arkansas Justice Building Commission, pursuant to §22-3-901 et seq., by the Arkansas State Department of Health Building Commission [abolished], pursuant to Acts 1965, No. 469, by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism or the agency performing the functions thereof, pursuant to §22-4-301 et seq., or by the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services or the agency performing the functions thereof, pursuant to §20-48-411 and §20-48-501 et seq.

(c)

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in any manner so as to affect, supersede, or in any other way alter the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities as created by §§10-3-1101 —10-3-1104 and10-3-1106 —10-3-1110, and the provisions of §§10-3-1101 —10-3-1104 and10-3-1106 —10-3-1110 shall not be repealed by this chapter.

(d)(1)

However, it is the intent of the General Assembly that the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, §19-4-101 et seq., be applicable to all provisions and implementations of this chapter insofar as the provisions and implementation of this chapter are not in direct conflict with that law.

(2)

It is the further intent that all procedures for contract bidding now or hereafter established by law or regulation applicable to capital improvements, as defined by this chapter, of state agencies shall be in full force and effect as to the implementation of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, §§ 14, 16; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-1030, 5-1030n; Acts 1991, No. 12, § 2; 1999, No. 555, § 10; 2019, No. 910, § 5679.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 235, § 1 provided:

“The Justice Building Commission created by Arkansas Code 22-3-904 is hereby abolished and all of its powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds are hereby transferred to the Arkansas State Building Services created by Arkansas Code 22-2-104.”

Acts 1965, No. 469: Sections 1-9, 11-21, 23, and 24 of Acts 1965, No. 469, referred to in this section, are set out in the Appendix to Title 19; section 10 is codified as §20-7-123; and section 22 is noted at §20-7-123.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment rewrote (a).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (b).

22-2-104. Creation of Building Authority Division.

(a)

There is created within the Department of Transformation and Shared Services the Building Authority Division.

(b)

The division shall carry out the duties and responsibilities set out in §22-2-108 under the policies, guidelines, standards, and procedures established by the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1020; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 22; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 22; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 52; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 52; 2019, No. 910, § 6155.

A.C.R.C.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 235, § 1, provided:

“The Justice Building Commission created by Arkansas Code 22-3-904 is hereby abolished and all of its powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds are hereby transferred to the Arkansas State Building Services created by Arkansas Code 22-2-104.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.) Nos. 7 and 8 rewrote the section.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “with the advice of the Building Authority Council” from the end of the last sentence.

The 2019 amendment designated the section as (a) and (b); rewrote (a); and substituted “Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Department of Finance and Administration” in (b).

22-2-105. Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services — Duties.

(a)

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services may hire sufficient staff as authorized by legislation to perform the duties of the Building Authority Division. Personnel employed by the secretary shall be compensated according to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq., for similar duties and responsibilities.

(b)

The secretary shall be responsible for administering the rules and policies adopted by the Department of Transformation and Shared Services pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(c)

The secretary shall be the disbursing agent for the division and shall pay any and all accounts. The disbursing agent shall furnish and keep in effect a bond to the state with a corporate surety thereon which, together with any other bonds furnished by him or her, shall total in final sum not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and is conditioned that he or she will faithfully perform his or her duties and properly handle all funds received and disbursed by him or her and account for those funds. The bond so furnished shall be filed in the office of the Auditor of State. The premium on the bond shall be a proper charge against funds of the division.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1021; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 23; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 23; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 53; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 53; 2019, No. 315, § 2341; 2019, No. 910, § 6156.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subsection (c) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to §21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See §21-2-703.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Pursuant to §1-2-303, obsolete language concerning the Building Authority Council has been removed from this section.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 rewrote the section heading; deleted former (a) and (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; rewrote the first sentence in present (a); substituted “adopted by the Department of Finance and Administration with the advice of the” for “of the Arkansas” in present (b); and substituted “the division” for “the authority” twice in (c).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “with the advice of the Building Authority Council” following “Administration” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in the section heading and in (a); deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a); substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout the section; and substituted “Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Department of Finance and Administration” in (b).

22-2-106. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the creation of the Building Authority Council, was repealed by identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, §
50. The section was derived from Acts 1975, No. 716, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1020; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 214; 1999, No. 1173, § 1; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 24; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 24.

22-2-107. Creation of Building Authority Division sections.

(a)

There are created within the Building Authority Division the following sections which shall have the duties and responsibilities designated by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services and which may include, in relation to other provisions of this chapter, the duties and responsibilities respectively designated in this section:

(1)

Construction Section. The Construction Section shall:

(A)

Supervise the bidding and awarding of contracts for new construction and renovations for or by state agencies' capital improvements;

(B)

Establish and maintain complete construction files on all jobs, including plans and specifications for alterations, renovations, and repairs of all capital improvements;

(C)

Approve all proposed contracts, change orders, and final payments requests;

(D)

Ensure that on-site observation of all construction projects, alterations, and repairs is accomplished on a regular basis and maintain records of those observations;

(E)

Obtain and maintain construction inspection and observation reports from architects or engineers or their consultants from state agencies and institutions for all capital improvement construction projects;

(F)(i)

Conduct visits with the design professional to determine the responsibility and performance required by the contract documents.

(ii)

On-site observations by design professionals shall concur with the contractor's payment request and shall be submitted in written form with the pay request.

(iii)

The inspection and observation reports shall be as adopted by the secretary.

(iv)

State agencies shall engage the services of licensed architects or engineers for all projects covered by the Arkansas Architectural Act, §17-15-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Engineering Act, §17-30-101 et seq.; and

(G)

Ensure that the construction of all projects complies with the contract documents;

(2)

Building Operations Section. The Building Operations Section shall:

(A)

Operate, maintain, and manage public buildings as required by the provisions of this chapter or otherwise by law;

(B)

Provide for maintenance and operation, including janitorial services for any buildings, structures, or grounds which are owned, leased, or managed by the division as may be required by the provisions of this chapter; and

(C)

Develop and, upon adoption by the secretary, enforce procedures, standards, and criteria designed to standardize the level of maintenance on all public buildings and other capital improvements;

(3)

Design Review Section. The Design Review Section shall:

(A)

Establish procedures for the selection of engineering, environmental, architectural, and building design consultants' services by state agencies and by the division. The procedures shall ensure an equitable opportunity for all persons and firms;

(B)

Encourage, within the rules of the state, the timely and expedient commitment and expenditure of appropriations for capital improvements;

(C)

Establish standard fee schedules for design professional consultant services for capital improvements;

(D)

Develop and establish minimum design standards and criteria, which shall be made available to all design professionals in the state;

(E)

Utilize, require, or undertake studies concerning the needs for and costs of proposed capital improvements;

(F)

Review and approve, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, contracts for design professional consultant services, preliminary plans, cost estimates, building programs, feasibility studies, and construction bid documents for capital improvements and mediate architectural and engineering design and construction-related problems;

(G)

Assist in analyzing architectural and engineering design and construction problems at state-owned facilities;

(H)

Ensure that state agencies shall engage the services of licensed architects and licensed engineers for capital improvement projects which are not exempted by the requirements of:

(i)

The Arkansas Architectural Act, §17-15-101 et seq.;

(ii)

Section 17-30-101 et seq.; and

(iii)

Section 22-9-101 et seq.; and

(I)

The director shall employ within the Design Review Section the State Architect and the State Engineer who shall have sufficient private practice experience within their respective fields as well as be registered and licensed within the state; and

(4)

Real Estate Services Section. The Real Estate Services Section shall:

(A)

Develop and enforce minimum leasing, sale, and purchase of property standards and criteria for consideration and adoption by the secretary;

(B)

Design standard lease forms to be approved by the secretary for use by state agencies as provided in this chapter;

(C)

Assist state agencies and the secretary in determining and evaluating rental space needs and the allocation of space for state agencies;

(D)

Conduct surveys to determine available rental space that meets minimum leasing standards and criteria and that may be available for use by state agencies;

(E)

Otherwise carry out and administer those duties and responsibilities delegated to the Real Estate Services Section by the secretary and assist state agencies to ensure that rental space acquired and utilized by state agencies is acquired and utilized in a manner consistent with the intent of this chapter so that no state agency shall lease space that is not absolutely essential to the efficient performance of its duties and responsibilities; and

(F)

Carry out and administer those duties and responsibilities involving the purchase or sale of property by state agencies that are under the jurisdiction of the division so as to ensure that the property is sold or purchased in a manner consistent with Arkansas laws and rules.

(b)

The secretary may transfer the various duties and functions among the various sections of the division and effect any other organizational or administrative changes that may be necessary to bring about the efficient and effective implementation of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1022; Acts 1987, No. 815, §§ 1, 2; 1995, No. 983, § 1; 1999, No. 494, § 1; 2001, No. 542, § 1; 2003, No. 364, §§ 9, 10; 2003, No. 827, §§ 1, 2; 2007, No. 186, § 8; 2009, No. 193, § 7; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 25; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 25; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 54; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 54; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2342, 2343; 2019, No. 910, § 6157.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Pursuant to §1-2-303, obsolete language concerning the Building Authority Council has been removed from this section.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment added (a)(1)(H).

The 2001 amendment substituted “in this section” for “below” in the introductory language of (a); inserted subsection headings; substituted “Conduct visits by the design professional” for “The design professional shall conduct visits” in (a)(1)(F)(i); substituted “the council” for “the State Building Services Council” in (a)(1)(F)(iii), (a)(2)(C), (a)(3)(A), (a)(4)(A), and (a)(5)(A); substituted “Operations” for “Operation/Maintenance” in (a)(2); deleted “Arkansas” preceding “State Building” in (a)(2)(B), (a)(3)(A), and (a)(5)(A); substituted “Real Estate Services” for “Leasing” in the introductory language in (a)(4) and (a)(4)(E); inserted “sale, and purchase of property” in (a)(4)(A); inserted (a)(4)(F); and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2003 amendment by No. 364 deleted “Approve methods of finance and” from the beginning of (a)(1)(B); inserted “final” in (a)(1)(C); substituted “observation” for “inspection” and “observations” for “inspections” in (a)(1)(D); substituted “with” for “by” in (a)(1)(F)(i); inserted “by design professionals” in (a)(1)(F)(ii); substituted “capital improvements” for “construction” in (a)(3)(B).

The 2003 amendment by No. 827 rewrote (a)(3); and repealed former (a)(5), concerning the “Engineering Section.”

The 2009 amendment deleted (a)(1)(H), and made related changes.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 rewrote the introductory language of (a); inserted “director with the advice of the” in (a)(1)(F)(iii), (a)(2)(C), (a)(4)(A), and (a)(4)(B); substituted “the division” for “the authority” in (a)(2)(B), (a)(3)(A), (a)(4)(F), and (b); deleted “of the authority” following “Section” in (a)(3)(I); inserted “the director” in (a)(4)(C); and substituted “Real Estate Services Section” for “section” in (a)(4)(E).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “with the advice of the Building Authority Council” following the second occurrence of “Administration” in the introductory language of (a); and deleted “with the advice of the council” from the end of (a)(1)(F)(iii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(3)(B); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(4)(F).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in the introductory language of (a), deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”, and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration”.